Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2722
Infected flock, defined.

Infected flock means any flock in which the designated scrapie epidemiologist has determined that a scrapie-positive female animal has resided unless an epidemiological investigation conducted by the designated scrapie epidemiologist shows that the animal did not lamb or abort in the flock. A flock will no longer be considered an infected flock after it has completed the requirements of a flock plan.

Laws 2003, LB 158, § 22.